Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 18 Nurseries and Nursery Stock

2-18-1 — 2-18-8.
[Superseded.]

2-18-9.
Abatement of plant diseases as nuisance — Liability for cost.

The chief entomologist and the director of environmental management, or either of them, may personally or through his or her deputies inspect any orchard, garden, field or roadside in public or private grounds which he or she knows, or has reason to suspect,
is infested with any seriously injurious insect pests or plant diseases when, in his or her judgment, the presence of those pests or plant diseases are a nuisance to adjoining owners and shall give any instructions and directions that
may be necessary in order that the nuisance may be abated. If the owner or person in charge of the trees or other plants constituting the nuisance fails within a reasonable time to follow the directions of the chief entomologist and
the director of environmental management, and abate the nuisance, the chief entomologist and the director of environmental management may cause the necessary work to be done and the cost of that work shall be charged to that owner
or person in charge of the trees or other plants, and the actual cost of the work shall be recovered in an action of the case to be brought by the general treasurer and the money received paid into the treasury of the state to be added
to the regular annual appropriation of the department of environmental management.

History of Section. P.L. 1913, ch. 940, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 282, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 226, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-18-9

.

2-18-10.
Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm or corporation violating §

2-18-9

or offering any hindrance to the carrying out of any part of this section, shall be adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars
($100) for each offense.

History of Section. P.L. 1913, ch. 940, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 282, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 226, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

2-18-10

.

2-18-11.
Rules and regulations — Revocation of license by director.

The director of environmental management has the power to prescribe any general rules and regulations, not contrary to law, that may in his or her opinion facilitate the carrying out of the provisions of this chapter, and may revoke any certificate or
license issued by the director, if in his or her opinion that action is necessary.

History of Section. P.L. 1913, ch. 940, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 282, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 226, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-18-11

.

2-18-12.
Appeals from chief entomologist to director.

Any person aggrieved by any order made by the chief entomologist may appeal to the director of environmental management. The person may file with the director of environmental management, within five (5) days after the order is made or issued by the chief
entomologist, a claim of appeal from the order, the appeal to be in writing.

History of Section. P.L. 1913, ch. 940, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 282, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 226, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

2-18-12

.

2-18-13.
Prosecution of offenses.

All prosecutions under the provisions of §§

2-18-9

—

2-18-13

shall be instituted by the director of environmental management, and shall be directed by him or her, and all penalties recovered for the violation of any of the provisions of those sections shall be paid into the treasury
of the state. In prosecutions for violation of any provisions of §§

2-18-9

—

2-18-13

commenced by the director, it is not necessary that he or she enter into recognizance or give surety for costs to prosecute those violations.

History of Section. P.L. 1913, ch. 940, §§ 13, 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 282, §§ 19, 20; C.L. 1938, ch. 226, §§ 17, 18; G.L. 1956, §

2-18-13

.

2-18-14 — 2-18-18.
[Superseded.]